Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1466
Aircraft; operation while under influence of liquor or drug; violation; penalty.

Any person who shall operate or be in the actual physical control of any aircraft while under the influence of alcoholic liquor or of any drug or while having five-hundredths of one percent by weight of alcohol in his or her body fluid as shown by chemical analysis of his or her blood or breath shall be deemed guilty of a crime and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished as provided in sections 28-1467 to 28-1469.

Laws 1978, LB 903, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 773, § 2.